Hawaii statutes.
[§196-62] Hawaii green infrastructure loan program. There is established a Hawaii green
infrastructure loan program, which shall be a loan program as defined under
section 39-51. The program shall be administered by the authority on
behalf of the department in a manner consistent with chapter 39, part III. This loan program may
include loans made to private entities, whether corporations, partnerships,
limited liability companies, or other persons, which
entities may lease or provide green infrastructure equipment to electric
utility customers, as well as direct loans to electric utility customers, on
terms approved by the authority. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next